California statutes. Education Code
(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld may not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the school district agency and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the design-build entity, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, that
 a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the school district and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.45.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 17250.50.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.50.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: Delayed operative date applies to Chapter 2.5, commencing with Section 17250.10.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.52.

Beginning January 1, 2023, a project using an alternative design-build contract, as defined in Section 17250.60, entered into on or after January 1, 2023, shall be governed by Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 17250.60).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 13.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Alternative Design-Build Contracts [17250.60. - 17250.69.]

17250.60.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Alternative design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single design-build entity based on its proposed design cost, general conditions, overhead, and profit as a component of the project price.

(b) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that may include, but are not limited to, price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance.

(2) A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest
 cost proposal meeting the interests of the school district and the objectives of the project, selection of the best proposal for a stipulated sum established by the procuring school district, or a tradeoff between price and other factors.

(c) “Construction subcontract” means a subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or will render service to the design-build entity in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the state which, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(d) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able
 to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services, as needed, pursuant to an alternative design-build contract.

(e) (1) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity and the individuals or other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team.

(2) Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Project” means the construction of any school facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.61.

(a) A school district, with approval of its governing board, may procure alternative design-build contracts for projects in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000), awarding the contract to either the low bid or the best value.

(b) The school district shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the school district relating to the solicitation of an alternative design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to each school district entering into alternative design-build contracts authorized under
 this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.62.

The procurement process for alternative design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The school district shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but are not limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the school district’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(2) The documents shall not
 include a design-build-operate contract for a project. The documents, however, may include operations during a training or transition period, but shall not include long-term operations for a project.

(b) The school district shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify, or develop a short list of, the design-build entities whose proposals shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the school district to evaluate proposals, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the school district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the school district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, acceptable safety record, and all other nonprice-related factors.

(3) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the school district. In preparing the standard template, the school district may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other school districts interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The template shall require the following information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of statement of
 qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that the proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain
 all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category, or if the
 proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system, as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) (A) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(B) Information required under this subdivision that is not otherwise a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(c) (1) A design-build entity shall not be prequalified or shortlisted unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the school district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained
 workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The school district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the school district before January 1, 2023.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) Based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), the school district shall prepare a request for proposals that invites prequalified or shortlisted entities to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the school district. The request for proposals shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and
 needs of the project or contract, the estimated cost of the project, the methodology that will be used by the school district to evaluate proposals, whether the contract will be awarded on the basis of low bid or best value, and any other information deemed necessary by the school district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the school district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating proposals, including, but not limited to, cost or price and all nonprice-related factors.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for proposals.

(4) Where a best value selection method is used, the school district may reserve the right to request proposal revisions and hold discussions and negotiations with responsive
 proposers, in which case the school district shall so specify in the request for proposals and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for proposals applicable procedures to be observed by the school district to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are conducted in good faith.

(e) For those projects using low bid as the final selection method, the competitive bidding process shall result in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or shortlisted design-build entities, and awards shall be made to the design-build entity that is the lowest responsible bidder.

(f) For those projects using best value as a selection method, the alternative design-build competition shall progress as follows:

(1) Competitive proposals shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically
 identified in the request for proposals. The following minimum factors, however, shall be weighted as deemed appropriate by the school district:

(A) The proposing design-build entity’s design cost, general conditions, overhead, and profit as a component of the project price, unless a stipulated sum is specified.

(B) Technical design and construction expertise.

(C) Life-cycle costs over 15 or more years.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (d), the school district may hold discussions or negotiations with responsive proposers using the process articulated in the school district’s request for proposals.

(3) When the evaluation is complete, the responsive proposers shall be ranked based on a
 determination of value provided, provided that no more than three proposers are required to be ranked.

(4) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible design-build entity whose proposal is determined by the school district to have offered the best value to the public.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, upon issuance of a contract award, the school district shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The contract awarded shall be subject to further negotiation and amendment pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17250.65.

(6) The statement regarding the school district’s contract award, described in paragraph (5), and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an
 external audit.

(g) A contract awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed a construction contract within the meaning of Section 17603, and subject to the requirements of Section 20118.4 of the Public Contract Code. For purposes of this section, “original contract price,” as used in Section 20118.4 of the Public Contract Code, means the negotiated price established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17250.65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 26.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.63

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Project” means all construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, and maintenance work that is subject to a project labor agreement that meets the requirements of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) “School district” means a school district that operates a labor compliance program that received final approval from the Department of Industrial Relations before January 1, 1997.

(b) A school district entering into a contract awarded pursuant to this chapter for a project that is subject to the California Environmental
 Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) shall retain the discretion to do all of the following:

(1) Terminate the contract at any time before a final project design is submitted to the Division of the State Architect for approval.

(2) Modify the project design or feature in a manner the school district decides is necessary to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act, including, but not limited to, incorporation of mitigation measures identified in an environmental review document for the project to mitigate environmental impacts that the project may cause, or the adoption of alternatives to the project.

(3) Balance the benefits of the proposed project against any of the project’s significant environmental effects if the effects cannot be otherwise avoided or
 mitigated to a less than significant level.

(4) Disapprove the project design and not proceed with the project’s final design and construction.

(c) A contract awarded pursuant to this chapter by a school district for a project shall include terms specifying conditions set forth in subdivision (b) and shall condition the commencement of any activity beyond the design phase of the contract in compliance with applicable laws, including the California Environmental Quality Act.

(d) A design-build entity or its subcontractors performing work on a project for a school district shall not engage in any activity, including demolition, excavation, grading, or construction, under a contract awarded pursuant to this chapter beyond the design phase unless the school district issues a notice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 21152 of the Public Resources Code, as applicable, and issues a notice to proceed with the construction.

(e) For purposes of procuring and awarding an alternative design-build contract for a project pursuant to this chapter, a school district is deemed to have complied with the California Environmental Quality Act if the school district complies with subdivision (b) and a contract awarded pursuant to this chapter contains the terms and conditions described in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.64.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the school district, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The alternative design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The school district shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its alternative design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.65.

(a) The school district, in each alternative design-build request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the design-build entity statement of qualifications and proposal. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the proposal shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Following award of the alternative design-build contract, the design-build entity shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work:

(1) Provide
 public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the school district, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing. The process described in this subdivision does not apply to construction subcontractors listed in the original proposal, including, but not limited to, the construction subcontractors that were identified as part of the design-build team. Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1
 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) Construction subcontracts shall be subject to an open book evaluation by the school district. Based on the open book evaluation, the school district shall set the price of the alternative design-build contract. The alternative design-build contract may be subject to further negotiation or amendment. If the school district and the design-build entity are unable to reach an agreement, the school district may terminate the alternative design-build contract.

(d) A licensed construction subcontractor that provides design services used on a project authorized by this chapter shall not be responsible for any liability arising from that subcontractor’s design if the construction subcontract for that design is not performed by that subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.66.

(a) If the school district elects to award a project pursuant to this chapter, retention proceeds withheld by the school district from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent.

(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld may not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the school district agency and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the design-build entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or
 refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the school district and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.67.

(a) A school district that uses the alternative design-build procurement method pursuant to this chapter shall, no later than January 1, 2028, submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the procurement method.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the projects awarded using the alternative design-build procurement method.

(2) The contract award amounts.

(3) The design-build entities awarded the projects.

(4) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(5) A description of the prequalification process.

(6) The number of subcontractors listed by construction trade type on each project that provided design services, but did not meet the target price for their scope of work and therefore did not perform construction services on that project.

(7) Whether the school district used any portion of a design prepared by a subcontractor that did not perform the construction work.

(8) The number of subcontractors listed by construction trade type on each project that meet the definition of a
 small business under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(9) The number of subcontractors listed by construction trade type on each project that meet the definition of a microbusiness under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(10) If a project awarded under this chapter has been completed, an assessment of the project performance, including, but not limited to, a summary of any delays or cost increases.

(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.68.

Beginning January 1, 2023, this chapter shall govern a project using an alternative design-build contract entered into on or after January 1, 2023. Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law. This chapter shall not affect, invalidate, or limit any design-build contract awarded before the effective date of this chapter in accordance with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 17250.10), including any contract awarded under that chapter using an alternative design-build methodology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 17250.69.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.69.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 2.6 commencing with Section 17250.60.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Construction of School Buildings [17251. - 17376.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Department of Education:  Powers and Duties [17251. - 17256.]

17251.

The department shall:

(a) Upon the request of the governing board of a school district, advise the governing board of the school district on the acquisition of new schoolsites and, after a review of available plots, give the governing board of the school district in writing a list of the recommended locations in the order of their merit, considering especially the matters of educational merit, safety, reduction of traffic hazards, and conformity to the land use element in the general plan of the city, county, or city and county having jurisdiction. The governing board of the school district may purchase a site deemed unsuitable for school purposes by the department only after reviewing the report of the department on proposed sites at a public
 hearing. The department shall charge the school district a reasonable fee for each schoolsite reviewed not to exceed the actual administrative costs incurred for that purpose.

(b) Develop standards for use by a school district in the selection of schoolsites, in accordance with the objectives set forth in subdivision (a). The department shall investigate complaints of noncompliance with site selection standards, and shall notify the governing board of the school district of the results of the investigation. If that notification is received before the acquisition of the site, the governing board of the school district shall discuss the findings of the investigation in a public hearing.

(c) Establish standards for use by school districts to ensure that the design and construction of school facilities are educationally appropriate, promote school safety, and provide school districts
 with flexibility in designing instructional facilities.

(d) Upon the request of the governing board of a school district, review plans and specifications for school buildings in the school district. The department shall charge the governing board of a school district, for the review of plans and specifications, a reasonable fee not to exceed the actual administrative costs incurred for that purpose.

(e) Upon the request of the governing board of a school district, make a survey of the building needs of the school district, advise the governing board of the school district concerning the building needs, and suggest plans for financing a building program to meet the needs. The department shall charge the school district, for the cost of the survey, a reasonable fee not to exceed the actual administrative costs incurred for that purpose.

(f) Provide information relating to the impact or potential impact upon a schoolsite of hazardous substances, solid waste, safety, hazardous air emissions, and other information as the department may deem appropriate.

(g) (1) Develop strategies to assist small school districts with technical assistance relating to school construction and the funding of school facilities. The strategies may include informing the districts of how to receive the approval required for school construction, including the requirements of the Division of the State Architect, and how to secure state funding, including from the state bond funds made available pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “small
 school district” means a school district with fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   (AB 203)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17251.5.

Notwithstanding any law, when using exclusively local funds for acquisition of a potential schoolsite, a school district is not required to receive final approval of a site by the State Department of Education prior to adopting a resolution of necessity in an eminent domain proceeding or prior to closing escrow on a site purchase through voluntary sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 26.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17252.

All money collected by the State Department of Education under the provisions of this article shall be available for the use of the department pursuant to appropriations for any use that may from time to time be made by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17253.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The Department of Water Resources, pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Water Code, exercises regulatory control over dam safety in the State of California.

(2) The department approves all plans and specifications, certifies that any dam is safe to impound water, periodically inspects all dams for the continuing safety of all impounding structures, and may revoke any certification allowing impoundment of water if it is determined that the dam is a danger to life and property.

(b) If the Department of Water Resources has asserted and continues to exercise its regulatory control over the Domenigoni Valley Reservoir Project, the State Department of Education, when evaluating schoolsites, shall not require mitigation related to potential dam breach inundation of the Domenigoni Valley Reservoir Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17255.

The Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall, in consultation with the State Department of Education and the Division of the State Architect and the Office of Public School Construction within the Department of General Services, recommend best design practices that include energy efficiency measures for all new public schools. The practices and measures shall have as a goal incorporating energy efficiency design and technologies that would provide the greatest amount of energy efficiency savings within a cost recapture period of seven years. The commission may additionally recommend best design practices and measures that would be cost-effective taking into consideration life-cycle costs. The recommendations shall be reported to the Governor and the Legislature by October 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17256.

The department and the Office of Public School Construction shall each develop regulations that provide local educational agencies with flexibility in the design of instructional facilities under this article and the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10) for consideration by the state board and the State Allocation Board. The regulations shall be consistent with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10), as it read on January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 837, Sec. 4.   (AB 203)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans [17260. - 17268.]

17260.

As used in this article “school buildings” shall have the same meaning as in Section 17283.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 5.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17261.

The State Allocation Board shall obtain construction plans for school buildings appropriate for school districts in various climates and geographical conditions of the state. The plans shall be composed of plans designed to meet the needs of school districts requiring school buildings of various sizes. The plans may include landscape suggestions. The plans may include designs that promote the efficient use of energy and water, the maximum use of natural lighting and indoor air quality, the use of recycled materials and materials that emit a minimum of toxic substances, the use of acoustics conducive to teaching and learning, and other characteristics of high performance schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 35, Sec. 13.   Effective May 20, 2006.   Operative after November 7, 2006, pursuant to Sec. 25 of Ch. 35, and adoption of Prop. 1D.)
-------------------------------------------

17262.

Any school district may request sets of the plans and specifications obtained by the State Allocation Board as appropriate for use in constructing a school building of the type desired by the school district. The plans and specifications shall be furnished to the school district subject to the payment by the school district of the actual expense incurred by the State Allocation Board, but that payment shall not exceed more than 2 percent of the total cost of the project. Any payments received for the plans and specifications shall be paid into the 1998 State School Facilities Fund, the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, or the 2004 State School Facilities Fund, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 27.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17263.

The plans and specifications for any school building as defined in Section 17283, together with estimates of cost, shall be submitted by the board to the Department of General Services for approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17264.

(a) Commencing January 1, 1992, all plans and specifications for the construction of a new or modernized elementary school building shall be designed to provide appropriate space, consistent with the needs of the attendance area of the school, to accommodate before-school and after-school child care programs. The State Allocation Board may waive this requirement if it determines that the school district will experience an educational or financial hardship in this accommodation. 

(b) For purposes of this section, first consideration in the design of space to be used for the before-school and after-school child care programs shall be within the multipurpose room. 

(c) For purposes of this section, the terms “new construction” and “modernization” shall have the same meaning as those words are used in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 10.

(d) No funding shall be made available to any child care program or facility pursuant to this chapter unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The program facility is open to children without regard to any child’s religious beliefs or any other factor related to religion. 

(2) No religious instruction is included in the program. 

(3) The space in which the program is operated is not utilized in any manner to foster religion during the time used for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17265.

All provisions of Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive, are made applicable to school buildings as defined in Section 17283 constructed from plans and specifications furnished under Sections 17260 to 17267, inclusive, except as otherwise provided in the latter sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17266.

The district shall furnish its own architect or structural engineer, or both, for necessary structural engineering and supervision of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17267.

The governing board of a school district shall, before letting any contract for the construction of a school building as defined in Section 17283 according to the plans and specifications, file a set of the plans and specifications with the Department of General Services accompanied by a filing fee pursuant to Section 17300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17268.

(a) The governing board of a school district that elects not to receive state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) may not approve a project for the construction of a new school building, as defined in Section 17283, unless the project and its lead agency comply with the same requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17213 for schoolsite acquisition.

(b) As a condition to receiving state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10, the governing board of a school district may not approve a project for the construction of a new school building or schoolsite on leased or acquired land unless the project and the school district comply with the requirements specified in Sections 17213.1 and 17213.2.

(c) The project shall not be subject to subdivision (b) for a minor addition to a school if the project is eligible for a categorical or statutory exemption under guidelines issued pursuant to Section 21083 of the Public Resources Code, as set forth in the California Environmental Quality Act.
